Utah statutes.
78B-6-407.   Trial of issues of fact.
When a proceeding under this chapter involves the determination of an issue of
fact, the issue may be tried in the court in which the proceeding is pending
and determined in the same manner as issues of fact are tried and determined
in other civil actions in the court.
